Utah statutes.
78B-6-1102.   Action.
(1)  An action may be brought by any person whose property is injuriously
affected, or whose personal enjoyment is lessened by the nuisance.
(2)  Upon judgment, the nuisance may be enjoined or abated, and damages may be
recovered.
